Louisiana, session 2026, HB1145.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:2352(10) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2352. Definition of terms
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the meaning ascribed in
this Section:
* * *
(10) "Psychologist" means any person licensed as a psychologist in
accordance with the provisions of this Chapter. A person represents himself to be
a psychologist by using any title or description of services incorporating the words
"psychology", "psychological", or "psychologist", or by using any other terms which
imply that he is qualified to practice psychology or that he possesses expert
qualification in any area of psychology, or if that person offers to the public or
renders to individuals or to groups of individuals services defined as the practice of
psychology in this Chapter.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2402 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1145